District of Columbia statutes.
26-1310

Appointment as fiduciary.

In all cases in which application shall be made to any court in the District of Columbia, or wherever it becomes necessary or proper for said court to appoint a trustee, receiver, personal representative, special administrator, guardian of the estate of a minor, or committee of the estate of a person with mental illness, it shall and may be lawful for said court (but without prejudice to any preference in the order of any such appointments required by law) to appoint any such company organized under clause (1) of § 26-1301, with its assent, such trustee, receiver, personal representative, special administrator, committee, or guardian, with the consent of the guardian of the person of such minor; provided, however, that no court or judge who is an owner of or in any manner financially interested in the stock or business of such corporation shall commit by order or decree to any such corporation any trust or fiduciary duty.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1305, ch. 854, § 722
June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72,§ 207(b), 27 DCR 2155
Apr. 24, 2007, D.C. Law 16-305, § 39(a), 53 DCR 6198
1981 Ed., § 26-410.
1973 Ed., § 26-310.
D.C. Law 16-305 substituted “person with mental illness” for “lunatic”.